test/tools/spellcheckers/speller-gt-norm-yamls/basespellertests_speller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Normativity tests: # We should not generate non-standard or irrelevant forms:
    abrodh+V+PrfPrc:       "obr>eme"
    abrodh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:  "obr>e"
    hojjedh+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: "håjj>a"
    laakan+Adv:            "laakan"
    snaare+A+Comp+Der1+Der/Dimin+Sg+Com: "snaerie>b»odtj>ine"
    unnies+A+Sg+Gen:       "ånn>ene"
    unnies+A+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: "ånn>ene"
